ru_RU.dic
бежать/LRY
бормотать/LY
браться/LY
быть/LY
ввести/LY
вглядеться/LRTY
вертеть/LTY
вести/LY
взвести/LY
взлететь/LRTY
взорвать/LRY
взрасти/Y
взыскать/LRY
видеться/LY
вкрасться/LRY
влететь/LRTY
вмазаться/LRY
возгореться/LY
воззвать/LRY
возрасти/Y
воркотать/LY
воссесть/LRY
восстать/LRY
вписать/LRTY
вплести/LY
врасти/Y
врезать/BLMPRY
вскипеть/LRTY
всосать/LRY
всплыть/LRY
втесаться/LRY
выбежать/LRY
выглядеть/LTY
выгореть/LRTY
выдаться/LRY
выказать/LRY
вылететь/LRTY
вылизаться/LRY
вымазаться/LRY
выписаться/LRTY
выплакаться/LRY
выплескаться/LMRY
выпрячь/Y
высвистеть/LRTY
высидеться/LTY
высказаться/LRY
высосать/LRY
выстелить/LRY
вытерпеть/LRTY
вытоптать/LRY
вязать/LY
глядеть/LTY
гнать/LY
гоготать/LY
греметь/LTY
грохотать/LY
дать/BLRY
добежать/LRY
добраться/LRY
довертеться/LRY
довзыскать/LRY
доглядеть/LRY
догореть/LRTY
додраться/LRY
доискаться/LRY
докликаться/LY
долететь/LRTY
допахать/LRY
дописаться/LRTY
доплыть/LRY
доплясаться/LRY
дорасти/Y
дорезать/BLMPRY
досидеться/LRY
доскакать/LRY
дослать/LRY
доспать/LRY
достаться/LRY
драть/LY
жрать/LY
заблестеть/LRTY
забрать/LRY
забыть/LRY
завертеть/LRTY
завести/LY
завидеть/LRY
завраться/LRY
загалдеть/LRTY
загнать/LRY
загореть/LRTY
загреметь/LRTY
загрохотать/LRY
задать/BLRY
задрать/LRY
зазвенеть/LRTY
закряхтеть/LRTY
залететь/LRTY
замахать/BLMRY
замяться/LRY
записать/LRTY
заплести/LY
запродать/LRY
запрятаться/LRY
зарезать/LRY
засвистеть/LRTY
заскакать/LRY
засмотреться/LRY
застать/LRY
затесаться/LRY
захохотать/LRY
зачесать/LRTY
зашептать/LRY
защебетать/LRY
звенеть/LTY
избрать/LRY
известись/LY
измазаться/LRY
изрезать/LRY
искать/LY
исплакаться/LRY
казать/LY
клекотать/LY
корпеть/LY
кудахтать/BLRY
лизать/LY
мазать/LY
метаться/LY
мяться/LY
набрехать/LRY
наврать/LRY
нагнать/LRY
надорвать/LRY
надраться/LRY
назвать/LRY
накрасть/LRY
намазать/LRY
наорать/LRY
напахаться/LRY
наплескаться/LMRY
нарвать/LRY
насидеться/LRY
насосать/LRY
натоптать/LRY
нашуметь/LRY
недодать/LRY
низать/LY
обвязать/LRY
обежать/LRY
облезть/LY
обмазать/LRY
оборвать/LRY
обрезаться/LMPRY
обтесать/LRY
обыскаться/LRY
оглядеться/LRTY
описаться/BLMRY
опоясать/LRY
осмотреть/LRTY
отбыть/LRY
отвязаться/LRY
отказать/LRY
отмазаться/LRY
оторваться/LRY
отпахать/LRY
отплыть/LRY
отсидеть/LRTY
отстать/LRY
отыскать/LRY
перебежать/LRY
перевести/LY
перевязать/LRY
перегореть/LRTY
передрать/LRY
переизбрать/LRY
перелезть/LY
перепахать/LRY
переплыть/LRY
перепрятаться/LRY
пересвистеть/LRY
переслать/LRY
перестать/LRY
переучесть/LY
плакать/LY
плестись/LY
побормотать/LRY
повести/LY
поглядеть/LRTY
погоготать/LRY
погрохотать/LRY
подбежать/LRY
подглядеть/LRTY
подзагореть/LRY
подмазать/LRY
подослать/LRY
подпоясать/LRY
подраться/LRY
подсказать/LRY
подтесать/LRY
позабыться/LY
поискаться/LRY
покликать/LRY
полизать/LRY
помазаться/LRY
помяться/LRY
поорать/LRY
попахать/LRY
поплескать/LMRY
поплясать/LRY
попрятаться/LRY
порасти/Y
порыскать/BLMRY
поскрести/Y
посопеть/LRTY
потерпеть/LRTY
похлопотать/LRY
почесаться/LRTY
пошуметь/LRTY
превозмочь/Y
предписать/LRTY
предстать/LRY
прервать/LRY
прибрать/LRY
привидеться/LRY
привязаться/LRY
пригрести/Y
приискать/LRY
прилизаться/LRY
припасть/LRY
приплыть/LRY
присесть/LRY
присмотреться/LRTY
приубрать/LRY
пробежать/LRY
пробраться/LRY
провести/LY
прогнать/LRY
прогрести/Y
продаться/BLRY
прозвать/LRY
проискать/LRY
пролепетать/LRY
промахать/LMRY
пропасть/LRY
проплакать/LRY
пропыхтеть/LRY
пророкотать/LRY
просипеть/LRY
просмотреть/LRTY
проспаться/LRY
прохныкать/LRY
прошептать/LRY
прятать/LY
разбежаться/LRY
развязаться/LY
раздать/BLRY
размазать/LRY
разораться/LRY
разрезать/BLMPRY
раскудахтаться/LRY
расплакаться/LRY
расплясаться/LRY
рассвистеться/LRY
расстелить/BLRY
расхохотаться/LRY
рваться/LY
рукоплескать/LRY
сбыть/LRY
свистеть/LTY
сгрести/Y
сидеть/LTY
скакать/LY
слететь/LRTY
смазаться/LY
снискать/LRY
соврать/LRY
сопеть/LTY
соскрести/Y
спать/LY
сплестись/LY
спрятаться/LRY
стелить/BLPY
стрекотать/LY
сыскаться/LY
топотать/LY
тыкаться/BLMPY
убыть/LRY
увязать/LMPRY
угнаться/LRY
указать/LRY
унизать/LRY
упрятать/LRY
ускакать/LRY
устелить/LRY
хлопотать/LY
хрипеть/LTY
честь/Y
шипеть/LTY
